Hawaii, session 2026, HB2056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 as a grant-in-aid to the department of housing and land management of the city and county of Honolulu to hire     full-time equivalent (     FTE) employees to fulfill obligations created by Act 206, Session Laws of Hawaii 2017, and Act 210, Session Laws of Hawaii 2018. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the city and county of Honolulu for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 as a grant-in-aid to the department of design and construction of the city and county of Honolulu for surveying, title searches, easement requisition services, and other related costs, as required to fulfill obligations created by Act 206, Session Laws of Hawaii 2017, and Act 210, Session Laws of Hawaii 2018. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the city and county of Honolulu for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request